Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-811
Teachers' and administrators' certificates or permits; college credits submitted; certification.

All college credits submitted for the purpose of obtaining a certificate or permit shall be earned in or accepted by a standard institution of higher education and shall be certified by the proper authorities of the institution attended, showing the academic and professional preparation of the applicant.

Laws 1963, c. 491, § 6, p. 1571;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1247.08;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 441;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 11.

Approval of teacher education programs, State Board of Education, see section 79-318.